Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB72.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Nothing in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall be construed to override the requirement to:
(1) Provide emergency medical treatment to all patients as set forth in 42 U.S.C. sec.
1395dd or any other federal law governing emergency medical treatment; or
(2) Conduct examinations and collect evidence set forth in federal law governing
sexual assault crimes.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
Page 1 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 6 of this Act:
(1) "Conscience" means the sincerely held religious, moral, or ethical principles
held by a health care professional or a health care institution. For purposes of
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act, a health care institution's conscience shall be
determined by reference to its existing or proposed governing documents,
including religious, moral, or ethical guidelines, mission statement, constitution,
bylaws, articles of incorporation, policies, regulations, or other relevant
documents;
(2) "Disclosure" means a formal or informal communication or transmission, but
does not include a communication or transmission concerning policy decisions
that lawfully exercise discretionary authority, unless the health care professional
providing the communication or transmission reasonably believes that the
communication or transmission evinces:
(a) A violation of any law, rule, or regulation;
(b) A violation of any standard of care or other ethical guidelines for the
provision of any health care service; or
(c) Gross mismanagement or waste of funds, abuse of authority, practices or
methods of treatment that may put patient or client health at risk, or a
substantial and specific danger to public health or safety;
(3) "Discrimination":
(a) Means any adverse action taken against, or any threat of adverse action
communicated to, a health care professional or health care institution as a
result of exercising his, her, or its rights under Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(b) Includes but is not limited to any penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory action,
whether executed or threatened; and
(c) Does not include:
Page 2 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
1. The negotiation or purchase of, or the refusal to use or purchase,
health care services by an individual or nongovernmental entity; or
2. Good-faith efforts to accommodate a health care professional or
health care institution who exercises the rights protected under
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(4) "Health care institution":
(a) Means any public or private hospital, clinic, medical center, professional
association, ambulatory surgical center, private physician's office,
pharmacy, nursing home, medical school, nursing school, medical training
facility, or any other entity or location in which health care services are
performed; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to organizations, corporations, partnerships,
associations, agencies, networks, sole proprietorships, joint ventures, or any
other entity that provides health care services;
(5) "Health care professional":
(a) Means any person or individual who is authorized to participate in a health
care service; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to doctors, nurse practitioners, physician's
assistants, nurses, nurse's aides, allied health professionals, medical
assistants, hospital employees, clinic employees, nursing home employees,
pharmacists, pharmacy technicians and employees, medical school faculty
and students, nursing faculty and students, psychology and counseling
faculty and students, medical researchers, laboratory technicians,
counselors, and social workers;
(6) "Health care service" means medical research or health care provided to any
patient or client at any time over the entire course of treatment or medical
research, including but not limited to:
Page 3 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
(a) Testing;
(b) Diagnosis;
(c) Referral;
(d) Dispensing or administering any drug, medication, or device;
(e) Psychological therapy or counseling;
(f) Recordkeeping procedures;
(g) Creating medical records and notes related to treatments;
(h) Prognosis; or
(i) Therapy;
(7) "Hiring or licensing authority" means any official, board, commission, or
department of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, its agencies, or political
subdivisions, responsible by law for the hiring of persons for public employment
or the licensing of persons for occupations;
(8) "Participate in a health care service" means to provide, perform, assist with,
facilitate, refer for, counsel for, consult with regard to, admit for the purposes of
providing, or take part in any way in providing, any health care service; and
(9) "Regulated health care entity" means any health care professional or health care
institution that is certified, authorized, or licensed by the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, or that receives any form of state funding or state insurance
reimbursement.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A health care professional or health care institution shall have the right to refuse
to participate in any health care service which violates his, her, or its conscience.
(2) A health care professional or health care institution shall not be liable civilly,
criminally, or administratively for exercising his, her, or its right of conscience
with respect to a health care service.
Page 4 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
(3) A health care professional or health care institution shall not be subject to
discrimination in any manner by the Commonwealth, any of its political
subdivisions, or any regulated health care entity as a result of his, her, or its
decision to decline to participate in a health care service on the basis of
conscience.
(4) The exercise of the right of conscience is limited to conscience-based objections
to a particular health care service. This section shall not be construed to waive or
modify any duty a health care professional or health care institution may have to
provide other health care services that do not violate the professional’s or
institution’s conscience.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A health care professional shall not be discriminated against because he or she:
(a) Provided, caused to be provided, or is about to provide to his or her
employer, the Attorney General, any agency of the Commonwealth charged
with protecting health care rights of conscience, the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, Office for Civil Rights, or any
other federal agency charged with protecting health care rights of
conscience with information relating to any act or omission the health care
professional reasonably believes to be a violation of any provision of
Sections 1 to 6 of this Act;
(b) Testified or is about to testify in a proceeding concerning a violation; or
(c) Assisted, participated in, or is about to assist or participate in any
proceeding related to a violation.
(2) Unless the disclosure is prohibited by law, a health care professional shall not be
discriminated against because he or she disclosed information that he or she
reasonably believes evinces:
Page 5 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
(a) A violation of a relevant law, rule, or regulation;
(b) A violation of a standard of care or other ethical guideline for the provision
of health care services; or
(c) Gross mismanagement or waste of funds, abuse of authority, practices or
methods of treatment that may put patient or client health at risk, or a
substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Commonwealth and any of its agencies or political subdivisions, including
any hiring or licensing authority, shall not reprimand, sanction, deny, revoke, or
threaten to revoke a license, certification, or registration of, or otherwise
discriminate against, a health care professional for engaging in speech or
expressive activity that is protected by the First Amendment to the United States
Constitution, unless the Commonwealth, agency, or political subdivision
demonstrates that such action is the least restrictive means that is essential to
further a compelling government interest.
(2) (a) The relevant hiring or licensing authority shall provide a health care
professional notice of, and opportunity to respond to, any complaints it has
received if, after review of the complaint, the relevant hiring or licensing
authority concludes there is sufficient reason to conduct an investigation.
(b) The notice under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be given to the
health care professional only, and shall be sent no later than twenty-five
(25) days after receipt of the complaint, or within the period as otherwise
required by statute or administrative regulation, whichever occurs first.
(c) The hiring or licensing authority shall pay the health care professional an
administrative penalty of fifty dollars ($50) for every two (2) weeks the
complaint is not provided to the health care professional if the notice is
Page 6 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1588
provided more than twenty-five (25) days following the receipt of the
complaint.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 344 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person injured by a violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act shall have a civil
cause of action in Circuit Court to:
(a) Enjoin further violations;
(b) Recover actual damages sustained;
(c) Recover the costs of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees; and
(d) Provide any other appropriate relief, which may include reinstatement of a
health care professional to his or her previous position, reinstatement of
board certification, or relicensure of a health care institution.
(2) An additional burden or expense on another health care professional, health care
institution, or health care payer arising from the exercise of the right of
conscience shall not be a defense to any violation of Sections 1 to 6 of this Act.
Section 7. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 8. This Act may be cited as the Health Care Heroes Recruitment and
Retention Act.
Section 9. Whereas Kentucky has a health care professional work force
shortage and has a paramount interest in recruiting and retaining these professionals
through measures that protect their rights of conscience, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 7 of 7
BR158800.100 - 1588 - XXXX 2/13/2026 10:24 AM Jacketed